Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1322
Commission; power of eminent domain; purpose.

Subject to the approval of the Legislature and, if the Legislature is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission is authorized and empowered to acquire in the name of the State of Nebraska real estate by the use of eminent domain as provided in sections 72-213 to 72-222 for the following purposes:

(1) For transmitter buildings and tower sites with access roads;

(2) For guy anchors for towers; and

(3) For transmission and reception facilities of telecommunications technology distribution systems.

Laws 1965, c. 535, § 1, p. 1680;

Laws 1969, c. 745, § 1, p. 2805;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 461, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2109;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 978;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 54.